North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 31. North Carolina Seed Law.
§ 106-277.23.
Notice of violations; hearings, prosecutions or warnings.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to give notice of every violation of the provisions of this Article with respect to agricultural or vegetable seeds, or mixtures of such seeds, to the person in whose hands such seeds are found, and to send copies of such notice to the shipper of such seed and to the person whose “analysis tag or label” is attached to the container of such seeds, in which notice the Commissioner may designate a time and place for a hearing. The person or persons involved shall have the right to introduce evidence either in person or by agent or attorney. If, after hearing, or without such hearing in the event the person fails or refuses to appear, the Commissioner is of the opinion that the evidence warrants prosecution he may institute proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction in the locality which the violation occurred or, if he believes the public interest will be adequately served thereby, he may direct to the alleged violator a suitable written notice or warning.

History.

1941, c. 114, s. 8; 1945, c. 828; 1949, c. 725; 1963, c. 1182; 2009-455, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-455, s. 9, effective October 1, 2009, deleted “or screenings” following “such seeds” throughout; and substituted “the Commissioner” for “he” near the end of the first sentence.

§ 106-277.24.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any provision of this Article or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall pay a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). This fine shall not apply, however, to a retailer with respect to any transaction where the seed sold by the retailer was acquired by the retailer in a sealed container or package, or the retailer did not have reasonable knowledge that the seed sold was in violation of this Article. In determining the amount of the fine, the court shall consider the retail value of the seed sold in violation of the law, and in cases involving the unlawful sale of seed protected under the federal Plant Variety Protection Act, the court shall order the payment of restitution to any injured party for any losses incurred as a result of the unlawful sale.

History.

1941, c. 114, s. 8; 1945, c. 828; 1949, c. 725; 1963, c. 1182; 1993, c. 539, s. 758; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2013-345, s. 1(b).

§ 106-277.25.
Seizure and disposition of seeds violating Article.

Any lot of agricultural or vegetable seeds, mixtures of such seeds being sold, exposed for sale, offered for sale or held with intent to sell in this State contrary to the provisions of this Article shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the Commissioner to the resident judge of the superior court in the county in which the seeds or mixtures of such seeds are located. In the event the court finds the seeds to be in violation of the provisions of this Article and orders the condemnation thereof, such seeds shall be denatured, processed, destroyed, relabeled, or otherwise disposed of in compliance with the laws of this State; provided that in no instance shall such disposition be ordered by the court without first having given the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for the release of the seeds,
with permission to process or relabel to bring them into compliance with the provisions of this Article.

History.

1945, c. 828; 1949, c. 725; 1963, c. 1182; 2009-455, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-455, s. 10, effective October 1, 2009, deleted “or screenings” following “such seeds” near the beginning and end of the first sentence, deleted “or screenings” following “the seeds” and “such seeds” near the beginning of the second sentence, and deleted “mixtures of such seeds or screenings” following “release of the seeds” near the end.

§ 106-277.26.
Publication of test results and other information.

The Commissioner is authorized to publish the results of analyses, tests, examinations, studies and investigations made as authorized by this Article, together with any other information he may deem advisable.

History.

1941, c. 114, s. 6; 1943, c. 203, s. 4; 1945, c. 828; 1949, c. 725; 1953, c. 856, s. 5; 1957, c. 263, s. 3; 1963, c. 1182.

§ 106-277.27.
Cooperation with United States Department of Agriculture.

The Commissioner is authorized to cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture in seed law enforcement and testing seed for trueness as to kind and variety.

History.

1941, c. 114, s. 6; 1943, c. 203, s. 4; 1945, c. 828; 1949, c. 725; 1953, c. 856, s. 5; 1957, c. 263, s. 3; 1963, c. 1182.

§ 106-277.28.
License and inspection fees.

For the purpose of providing a fund to defray the expense of inspection, examination, and analysis of seeds and the enforcement of this Article:

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 588, s. 1.

Each seed dealer who offers for sale any agricultural, vegetable, or lawn or turf seeds for seeding purposes shall register with the Commissioner and shall obtain an annual license, for each location where activities are conducted, by January 1 of each year and shall pay the following license fee:

Wholesale or combined wholesale and retail seed dealer $125.00 b. Retail seed dealer $30.00. c., d. Repealed by Session Laws , effective October 1, 2009. 2009-455, s. 11

Click to view

Each seed dealer or grower who has seed, whether originated or labeled by the dealer or grower, that is offered for sale in this State shall report the quantity of seed offered for sale and pay an inspection fee of four cents (4¢) for each container of seeds weighing 10 pounds or more. Seed shall be subject to the inspection fee and reporting requirements only once in any 12-month period. This fee does not apply to seed grown by a farmer and offered for sale by the farmer at the farm where the seed was grown.Each seed dealer or grower shall keep accurate records of the quantity of seeds and container weights offered for sale from each distribution point in the State. These records shall be available to the Commissioner or an authorized representative of the Commissioner at any and all reasonable hours for the purpose of verifying the quantity of seed offered for sale and the fees paid. Each seed dealer or grower shall report quarterly on forms furnished by the Commissioner the quantity and container weight of seeds first offered for sale that quarter. The reports shall be made on the first day of January, April, July, and October, or within 10 days thereafter. Inspection fees shall be due and paid with the next quarterly report filed after the seed is first offered for sale. If the report is not filed and the inspection fees paid to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services by the tenth day following the date due, or if the report of the quantity or container weights is false, the Commissioner may issue a stop-sale order for all seed offered for sale by the dealer or grower. If the inspection fees are unpaid more than 15 days after the due date, the amount due shall bear a penalty of ten percent (10%) which shall be added to the inspection fees due.

History.

1941, c. 114, s. 7; 1945, c. 828; 1947, c. 928; 1949, c. 725; 1963, c. 1182; 1969, c. 105; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1034, s. 13; 1989, c. 37, s. 8; 1991, c. 98, s. 1; c. 588, s. 1; 1995, c. 47, s. 5; 1997-261, s. 48; 2005-276, s. 42.1(c); 2009-455, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 42.1(c), effective September 1, 2005, substituted “four cents (4¢)” for “two cents (2¢)” in subdivision (3).

Session Laws 2009-455, s. 11, effective October 1, 2009, in subdivision (2)a, substituted “$125.00” for “$100.00”; in subdivision (2)b, deleted “with sales of no more than $500.00” following “Retail seed dealer” and substituted “$30.00” for “5.00”; and deleted subdivisions (2)c and (2)d.

§ 106-277.29.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-210, s. 2, effective January 1, 1999.

§ 106-277.30.
Filing complaint; investigation; referral to Seed Board.

Complaint by Buyer. — When a buyer believes that he or she has suffered damages due to the failure of agricultural or vegetable seed to produce or perform as labeled or as warranted, or as the result of negligence, the buyer may make a sworn complaint against the dealer from whom the seeds were purchased, alleging the damages sustained or to be sustained, and file the complaint with the Commissioner within such time as to permit inspection of the seed, crops, or plants. The buyer shall send a copy of the complaint to the dealer by registered or certified mail. A filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be paid to the Department with each complaint filed. This fee may be used by the Commissioner to offset the expenses of the Seed Board incurred under

G.S. 106-277.32

. Within 10 days after receipt of a copy of the complaint, the dealer may file an answer to the complaint and, in that event, shall send a copy to the buyer by registered or certified mail.

Investigation Requested by Dealer. — Any dealer who has received notice, either orally or in writing, that a buyer believes that he or she has suffered damage due to the failure of agricultural or vegetable seed sold by the dealer to perform as labeled or as warranted, or as a result of negligence, may request an investigation by the Seed Board pursuant to

G.S. 106-277.32

. A filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be paid to the Department by the party requesting the investigation. The dealer shall send a copy of the request to the buyer by registered or certified mail. The buyer may file a response to the request with the Commissioner within 10 days of receipt of the request for an investigation.

Referral to Seed Board. — The Commissioner shall refer the complaint or request for investigation to the Seed Board to investigate and make findings and recommendations on the matters complained of pursuant to

G.S. 106-277.32

.

History.

1998-210, s. 3.

§ 106-277.31.
Notice required.

Dealers shall legibly print or type on each seed container or affix a label on each seed container a notice in the following form or using reasonably equivalent language:

“Notice of Claims Procedure for Defective Seed

North Carolina provides an opportunity for persons who believe that they have suffered damage from the failure of agriculture or vegetable seeds to perform as labeled or warranted, or as a result of negligence, to have the matter investigated and heard before a special seed board as an alternative to filing a court action. To take advantage of this procedure, a purchaser of seed must file a complaint with the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture in time for the seed, crop, or plants to be inspected. Failure to follow this procedure will limit the amount of damages you may be able to recover. Please contact the Commissioner of Agriculture for information about this claims procedure.”

History.

1998-210, s. 3.

§ 106-277.32.
Seed Board created; membership; duties.

The Commissioner shall appoint a Seed Board composed of five members, three of whom shall be appointed upon the recommendation of the following: Director of the Agricultural Research Service, North Carolina State University; Director of the North Carolina Cooperative Extension Service, North Carolina State University; and President of the North Carolina Seedsmen’s Association. The other two members shall include: one farmer who is not connected in any way to selling seeds at retail or wholesale and one employee of the Department. An alternate for each member shall also be appointed in the same manner as that member was appointed to serve whenever that member is unable or unwilling to serve. Each member of the Board shall serve a four-year term at the discretion of the Commissioner. The Board shall elect a chairperson. The chairperson shall conduct all meetings and deliberations and direct all other activities of the Board. Three members of the Board shall constitute a quorum and at least three board members must vote affirmatively for the Board to take any action.

A clerk shall be appointed to serve the Board. The clerk shall be an employee of the Department. The clerk shall keep accurate and correct records of all meetings and deliberations and perform other duties for the Board as directed by the chairperson.

The Department shall provide administrative support for the investigation under this section. The Board shall adopt rules to govern investigations and hearings. A copy of the rules shall be mailed to each party to a dispute upon receipt of a complaint.

Members of the Board appointed by the Commissioner who are not governmental employees shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for necessary travel and subsistence expenses pursuant to

G.S. 138-5

. Members of the Board who are State employees shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for necessary travel and subsistence expenses pursuant to

G.S. 138-6

.

The Attorney General shall represent the Board in any and all legal proceedings that may arise concerning or against the Board.

History.

1998-210, s. 3.

§ 106-277.33.
Duties of Seed Board.

In conducting its investigation of claims referred by the Commissioner, the Seed Board may engage in the following activities:

Examine the buyer regarding the buyer’s use of the seed of which the buyer complains and examine the dealer on the dealer’s packaging, labeling, and selling of the seed alleged to be faulty.

Grow a representative sample of the alleged faulty seed to production when such action is deemed by the Board to be necessary.

Hold informal hearings at a time and place directed by the chairperson upon reasonable notice to the buyer and the dealer.

Seek evaluations from authorities in allied disciplines, when deemed necessary by the Board.

Visit and inspect the affected site and take samples, make plant counts, and take pictures of affected and unaffected areas.

The Board shall keep a record of its activities and reports on file in the Department. The Department shall transmit all findings and recommendations to the buyer and to the dealer within 30 days of completion of the investigation.

No investigation shall be made by less than the whole membership of the Board unless the chairperson directs such investigation in writing. Such investigation shall be summarized in writing and considered by the Board in reporting its findings and making its recommendations.

The report of the investigation and the recommendations of the Seed Board shall be binding upon all parties to the extent, if any, that they have so agreed in writing subsequent to the filing of the complaint pursuant to

G.S. 106-277.30

.

History.

1998-210, s. 3.

§ 106-277.34.
Actions regarding defective seed claims; evidence.

In any court action involving a complaint that has been the subject of an investigation under

G.S. 106-277.32

, any party may introduce evidence of seed quality, cultivation practices and procedures, and scientific opinion contained in the report of the Seed Board. Statements of the parties and recommendations of the Seed Board as resolution of the dispute are not admissible as evidence unless such evidence is otherwise discoverable.

In any court action where a buyer alleges that he or she suffered damages due to the failure of agricultural or vegetable seed to produce or perform as labeled or warranted, or as the result of negligence, and the buyer failed to make a sworn complaint against the dealer as set forth in

G.S. 106-277.30

, the buyer’s right to recover damages shall be limited to actual expenditures paid by the buyer to other persons for the cost of seed, labor, equipment, fertilizer, insecticide, herbicide, land rent, or other expenses incurred in connection with the cultivation of the seed alleged to be defective, less any value received by the buyer arising from the sale or transfer of any crops grown from the seed in question.

History.

1998-210, s. 3.

§§ 106-278 through 106-284.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.